Illinois, session 104th, HB4193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing Section 10-40 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 705/10-40)7    Sec. 10-40. Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds that in order to address 9the disparities described below, aggressive approaches and 10targeted resources to support local design and control of 11community-based responses to these outcomes are required. To 12carry out this intent, the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew (R3) 13Program is created for the following purposes:14        (1) to directly address the impact of economic 15    disinvestment, violence, and the historical overuse of 16    criminal justice responses to community and individual 17    needs by providing resources to support local design and 18    control of community-based responses to these impacts;19        (2) to substantially reduce both the total amount of 20    gun violence and concentrated poverty in this State;21        (3) to protect communities from gun violence through 22    targeted investments and intervention programs, including 23    economic growth and improving family violence prevention,   HB4193- 2 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1    community trauma treatment rates, gun injury victim 2    services, and public health prevention activities;3        (4) to promote employment infrastructure and capacity 4    building related to the social determinants of health in 5    the eligible community areas.6    (b) In this Section, "Authority" means the Illinois 7Criminal Justice Information Authority in coordination with 8the Justice, Equity, and Opportunity Initiative of the 9Lieutenant Governor's Office and the R3 Community Steering 10Committee.11    (c) Eligibility of R3 Areas. Within 180 days after the 12effective date of this Act, the Authority shall identify as 13eligible, areas in this State by way of historically 14recognized geographic boundaries, to be designated by the 15Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program Board as R3 Areas and 16therefore eligible to apply for R3 funding. Local groups 17within R3 Areas will be eligible to apply for State funding 18through the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program Board. 19Qualifications for designation as an R3 Area are as follows:20        (1) Based on an analysis of data, communities in this 21    State that are high need, underserved, disproportionately 22    impacted by historical economic disinvestment, and ravaged 23    by violence as indicated by the highest rates of gun 24    injury, unemployment, child poverty rates, and commitments 25    to and returns from the Illinois Department of 26    Corrections.  HB4193- 3 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1        (2) The Authority shall send to the Legislative Audit 2    Commission and make publicly available its analysis and 3    identification of eligible R3 Areas and shall recalculate 4    the eligibility data every 4 years. On an annual basis, 5    the Authority shall analyze data and indicate if data 6    covering any R3 Area or portion of an Area has, for 4 7    consecutive years, substantially deviated from the average 8    of statewide data on which the original calculation was 9    made to determine the Areas, including disinvestment, 10    violence, gun injury, unemployment, child poverty rates, 11    or commitments to or returns from the Illinois Department 12    of Corrections.13    (d) The Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program Board shall 14encourage collaborative partnerships within each R3 Area to 15minimize multiple partnerships per Area.16    (e) The Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program Board is 17created and shall reflect the diversity of the State of 18Illinois, including geographic, racial, and ethnic diversity. 19Using the data provided by the Authority, the Restore, 20Reinvest, and Renew Program Board shall be responsible for 21designating the R3 Area boundaries and for the selection and 22oversight of R3 Area grantees. The Restore, Reinvest, and 23Renew Program Board ex officio members shall, within 4 months 24after the effective date of this Act, convene the Board to 25appoint a full Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program Board and 26oversee, provide guidance to, and develop an administrative   HB4193- 4 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1structure for the R3 Program.2        (1) The ex officio members are:3            (A) The Lieutenant Governor, or his or her 4        designee, who shall serve as chair.5            (B) The Attorney General, or his or her designee.6            (C) The Director of Commerce and Economic 7        Opportunity, or his or her designee.8            (D) The Director of Public Health, or his or her 9        designee.10            (E) The Director of Corrections, or his or her 11        designee.12            (F) The Director of Juvenile Justice, or his or 13        her designee.14            (G) The Director of Children and Family Services, 15        or his or her designee.16            (H) The Executive Director of the Illinois 17        Criminal Justice Information Authority, or his or her 18        designee.19            (I) The Director of Employment Security, or his or 20        her designee.21            (J) The Secretary of Human Services, or his or her 22        designee.23            (K) A member of the Senate, designated by the 24        President of the Senate.25            (L) A member of the House of Representatives, 26        designated by the Speaker of the House of   HB4193- 5 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1        Representatives.2            (M) A member of the Senate, designated by the 3        Minority Leader of the Senate.4            (N) A member of the House of Representatives, 5        designated by the Minority Leader of the House of 6        Representatives.7        (2) Within 90 days after the R3 Areas have been 8    designated by the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program 9    Board, the following members shall be appointed to the 10    Board by the R3 board chair :11            (A) Eight public officials of municipal geographic 12        jurisdictions in the State that include an R3 Area, or 13        their designees, appointed by the R3 Program Board 14        chair;15            (B) Four community-based providers or community 16        development organization representatives who provide 17        services to treat violence and address the social 18        determinants of health, or promote community 19        investment, including, but not limited to, services 20        such as job placement and training, educational 21        services, workforce development programming, and 22        wealth building. The community-based organization 23        representatives shall work primarily in jurisdictions 24        that include an R3 Area and no more than 2 25        representatives shall work primarily in Cook County. 26        At least one of the community-based providers shall   HB4193- 6 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1        have expertise in providing services to an immigrant 2        population, appointed by the R3 Program Board chair;3            (C) Two experts in the field of violence 4        reduction, appointed by the R3 Program Board chair;5            (D) One male who has previously been incarcerated 6        and is over the age of 24 at the time of appointment, 7        appointed jointly by the Speaker of the House of 8        Representatives and the President of the Senate from 9        nominations received from not-for-profit organizations 10        that are currently in existence and have been 11        continuously in operation in an R3 Area since 1980;12            (E) One female who has previously been 13        incarcerated and is over the age of 24 at the time of 14        appointment, appointed jointly by the Speaker of the 15        House of Representatives and the President of the 16        Senate from nominations received from not-for-profit 17        organizations that are currently in existence and have 18        been continuously in operation in an R3 Area since 19        1980;20            (F) Two individuals who have previously been 21        incarcerated and are between the ages of 17 and 24 at 22        the time of appointment, appointed jointly by the 23        Speaker of the House of Representatives and the 24        President of the Senate from nominations received from 25        not-for-profit organizations that are currently in 26        existence and have been continuously in operation in   HB4193- 7 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1        an R3 Area since 1980; and2            (G) Eight individuals who live or work in an R3 3        Area, appointed by the R3 Program Board chair; and .4            (H) Eight individuals (i) who either have resided 5        at one point in their lives for over 30 years in an R3 6        Area and still have family or relatives residing in 7        the R3 Area or who currently reside in an R3 Area; (ii) 8        who possess expertise or backgrounds in the R3 Area in 9        the field of education, medicine, mental health, 10        housing, law, accounting, finance, business, or 11        religion; and (iii) who are appointed by the Speaker 12        of the House of Representatives and the President of 13        the Senate from nominations received from 14        not-for-profit organizations that are currently in 15        existence and have been continuously in operation in 16        the R3 Area since 1980. 17        As used in this paragraph (2), "an individual who has 18    been previously incarcerated" means a person who has been 19    convicted of or pled guilty to one or more felonies, who 20    was sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and who has 21    completed his or her sentence. Board members shall serve 22    without compensation and may be reimbursed for reasonable 23    expenses incurred in the performance of their duties from 24    funds appropriated for that purpose. Once all its members 25    have been appointed as outlined in items (A) through (F) 26    of this paragraph (2), the Board may exercise any power,   HB4193- 8 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1    perform any function, take any action, or do anything in 2    furtherance of its purposes and goals upon the appointment 3    of a quorum of its members. The Board terms of the non-ex 4    officio and General Assembly Board members shall end 4 5    years from the date of appointment. The R3 Program Board 6    board chair may remove an individual appointed to the 7    Board who does not regularly attend Board meetings, based 8    on criteria approved by the Board.9        Within 90 days after the effective date of this 10    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 11    President of the Senate and Speaker of the House shall 12    jointly appoint the members described in subparagraph (H) 13    of this paragraph (2). Upon a vacancy in the membership of 14    the R3 Program Board under this paragraph (2), the R3 15    Program Board chair shall appoint a member to fill a 16    vacancy under subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (G) of this 17    paragraph (2) and the President of the Senate and Speaker 18    of the House shall jointly appoint a member to fill a 19    vacancy under subparagraph (D), (E), (F), or (H) of this 20    paragraph (2). 21    (f) Within 12 months after the effective date of this Act, 22the Board shall:23        (1) develop a process to solicit applications from 24    eligible R3 Areas;25        (2) develop a standard template for both planning and 26    implementation activities to be submitted by R3 Areas to   HB4193- 9 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1    the State;2        (3) identify resources sufficient to support the full 3    administration and evaluation of the R3 Program, including 4    building and sustaining core program capacity at the 5    community and State levels;6        (4) review R3 Area grant applications and proposed 7    agreements and approve the distribution of resources;8        (5) develop a performance measurement system that 9    focuses on positive outcomes; 10        (6) develop a process to support ongoing monitoring 11    and evaluation of R3 programs; and12        (7) deliver an annual report to the General Assembly 13    and to the Governor to be posted on the Governor's Office 14    and General Assembly websites and provide to the public an 15    annual report on its progress.16    (g) R3 Area grants.17        (1) General grant Grant funds shall be awarded by the 18    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority, in 19    coordination with the R3 Program Board board, based on the 20    likelihood that the plan will achieve the outcomes 21    outlined in subsection (a) and consistent with the 22    requirements of the Grant Accountability and Transparency 23    Act. The R3 Program shall also facilitate the provision of 24    training and technical assistance for capacity building 25    within and among R3 Areas.26        (2) R3 Program Board grants shall be used to address   HB4193- 10 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1    economic development, violence prevention services, 2    re-entry services, youth development, and civil legal aid.3        (3) The Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program Board and 4    the R3 Area grantees shall, within a period of no more than 5    120 days from the completion of planning activities 6    described in this Section, finalize an agreement on the 7    plan for implementation. Implementation activities may:8            (A) have a basis in evidence or best practice 9        research or have evaluations demonstrating the 10        capacity to address the purpose of the Program program 11        in subsection (a); 12            (B) collect data from the inception of planning 13        activities through implementation, with data 14        collection technical assistance when needed, including 15        cost data and data related to identified meaningful 16        short-term, mid-term, and long-term goals and metrics;17            (C) report data to the Restore, Reinvest, and 18        Renew Program Board biannually; and19            (D) report information as requested by the R3 20        Program Board.21    (h) The R3 Community Steering Committee is hereby created. 22Within 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 23of the 104th General Assembly, the President of the Senate and 24Speaker of the House shall jointly appoint to the R3 Community 25Steering Committee 9 individuals from among individuals 26nominated by any not-for-profit organization that is currently   HB4193- 11 -LRB104 15844 BDA 29056 b1in existence and has been continuously in operation in an R3 2Area since 1968. A nominee shall possess expertise in an R3 3Area in the field of education, medicine, mental health, 4housing, law, accounting, finance, business, or religion. This 5nominee shall either (1) reside in the R3 Area or (2) have 6resided at one point in the nominee's life for over 30 years in 7the R3 Area and still have family or relatives residing in the 8R3 Area. The Restore, Reinvest, and Renew (R3) Program shall 9allocate and set aside at least 25% and no more than 30% of its 10annual funds for targeted community grant funding programs to 11be created, organized, and awarded by the Department of 12Commerce and Economic Opportunity, in coordination with the R3 13Community Steering Committee, for the purposes described in 14subsection (a) of this Section and consistent with the 15requirements of the Grant Accountability and Transparency Act. 16    (i) Funding for legal services under the R3 Program 17established in this Section shall exclude R3 Areas in Cook 18County unless approved by the Department of Commerce and 19Economic Opportunity, in coordination with the R3 Community 20Steering Committee.21(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 22102-98, eff. 7-15-21.)